New York, session 2025-2026, A8887.
do enact as follows:
Section 1. Section 396-b of the general business law, as added by
chapter 1031 of the laws of 1965, is amended to read as follows:
§ 396-b. Advertisements. 1. For the purposes of this section, the
following terms shall have the following meanings:
(a) "Artificial intelligence", "artificial intelligence technology",
or "AI" means a machine-based system that can, for a given set of
human-defined objectives, make predictions, recommendations, or deci-
sions influencing real or virtual environments, and that uses machine-
and human-based inputs to perceive real and virtual environments,
abstract such perceptions into models through analysis in an automated
manner, and use model inference to formulate options for information or
action. This definition includes but is not limited to systems that use
machine learning, large language model, natural language processing, and
computer vision technologies, including generative artificial intelli-
gence.
(b) "Generative artificial intelligence" means a class of artificial
intelligence models that are self-supervised and emulate the structure
and characteristics of input data to generate derived synthetic content,
including, but not limited to, images, videos, audio, text, and other
digital content.
(c) "Synthetic performer" means a digitally created asset created,
reproduced, or modified by computer, using generative artificial intel-
ligence or a software algorithm, that is intended to create the
impression that the asset is engaging in an audiovisual and/or visual
EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets
[ ] is old law to be omitted.
LBD00785-16-5

A. 8887--A 2
performance of a human performer who is not recognizable as any iden-
tifiable natural performer.
2. Any person, firm, corporation or association, or agent or employee
thereof, hereinafter called person, who, being engaged in the business
of dealing in any property, makes, publishes, disseminates, circulates
or places before the public or causes, directly or indirectly, to be
made, published, disseminated, circulated or placed before the public,
in this state, any advertisement respecting any such property, in any
newspaper, magazine, or other publication, or over any radio station or
television station, unless it is stated in any such advertisement that
the advertiser is a dealer in such property or from the context of any
such advertisement, it plainly appears that such person is a dealer in
such property so offered for sale in any such advertisement; or when
placing or causing any such advertisement to appear in any newspaper,
magazine or other publication or radio or television station as
described in this section, if requested by the publisher of any such
newspaper, magazine or other publication or owner or operator of such
radio or television station or any agent or representative thereof to
file with such owner or operator, publisher, agent or representative
thereof [his] such person's true name, or where [he] such person is
transacting business under a name other than the true name pursuant to
law, then the name under which such business is transacted, and each
business address wherein any business is transacted by [him] such
person, in the class of property advertised or to be advertised for sale
in such advertisement, shall make any false statement in relation to any
of such items; or if requested by the publisher of any such newspaper,
magazine or other publication or owner or operator of such radio or
television station or any agent or representative thereof to file with
such owner, operator, publisher, agent or representative thereof a
statement showing whether [he] such person is causing such advertisement
to appear or is offering to make such sale or disposition or trans-
action, as herein set forth, as principal or agent, and if as agent, to
set forth such information as is specified in this section, in relation
to [his] such person's principal as well as in relation to [himself]
such person, shall make any false statement in relation to any of such
items; is guilty of a misdemeanor.
3. Any person engaged in the business of dealing in any property or
service who for any commercial purpose produces or creates an advertise-
ment respecting any such property or service, in any medium or media in
which such advertisement appears, shall conspicuously disclose in such
advertisement that a synthetic performer is in such advertisement, where
such person, or agent or employee thereof, has actual knowledge. A
violation of this subdivision shall result in a civil penalty of one
thousand dollars for a first violation, and five thousand dollars for
any subsequent violation.
4. This section shall not apply to advertisements and promotional
materials for expressive works, including but not limited to, motion
pictures, television programs, streaming content, documentaries, video
games, or other similar audiovisual works, provided that the use of a
synthetic performer in the advertisement or promotional material is
consistent with its use in the expressive work.
5. Nothing in this section shall limit, reduce, or enlarge any rights
any person may have under section fifty, fifty-f, or fifty-one of the
civil rights law or under any other law.
6. Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit, or to enlarge,
the protections that 47 U.S.C. section 230 confers on an interactive

A. 8887--A 3
computer service for content provided by another information content
provider, as such terms are defined in 47 U.S.C. section 230.
7. This section shall not apply to advertisements and promotional
materials in any of the following circumstances:
(a) Audio advertisements; or
(b) Where the use of artificial intelligence solely involves the
language translation of a human performer.
8. (a) Nothing in this section shall apply to any medium used for
advertising, including, but not limited to, newspapers, magazines, and
television networks and stations, streaming services, cable television
systems, billboards, and transit advertisements, by whom any advertise-
ment or solicitation in violation of this section is published or
disseminated, unless it is established that the medium or employees had
actual knowledge by written notification that the advertising contained
a synthetic performer, and was given no more than five days, or as soon
as technically or practically feasible, to cease distribution or insert
the disclosure in the relevant advertisement required by this section.
(b) No entity that publishes or disseminates such advertisements
described in this section shall remove, destroy, modify or alter any
disclosure associated with such advertisement described in subdivision
three of this section prior to publishing or disseminating such adver-
tisement. Such actions shall constitute a violation and corresponding
civil penalty as described in subdivision three of this section.
§ 2. Severability clause. If any clause, sentence, paragraph, subdivi-
sion, section or part of this act shall be adjudged by any court of
competent jurisdiction to be invalid, such judgment shall not affect,
impair, or invalidate the remainder thereof, but shall be confined in
its operation to the clause, sentence, paragraph, subdivision, section
or part thereof directly involved in the controversy in which such judg-
ment shall have been rendered. It is hereby declared to be the intent of
the legislature that this act would have been enacted even if such
invalid provisions had not been included herein.
§ 3. This act shall take effect on the hundred eightieth day after it
shall have become a law.